test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-laeaeqnd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lǟʼnd: # Noun 139 'eng /est ??/fin' - full paradigm
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Nom: [lǟʼnd, lǟnd]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Gen: [lǟʼnd, lǟnd]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Par: [lǟʼndõ, lǟndõ]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Dat: [lǟʼndõn, lǟndõn]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Ins: [lǟʼnõks, lǟnõks]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Ill: [lǟʼndõ, lǟndõ]
     lǟʼnd+N+Sg+Ela: [lǟʼnõst, lǟnõst]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Nom: [lǟʼnõd, lǟnõd]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Gen: [lǟʼnõd, lǟnõd]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Par: [lǟʼnidi, lǟnidi]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Dat: [lǟʼnõdõn, lǟnõdõn]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Ins: [lǟʼnõdõks, lǟnõdõks]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Ill: [lǟʼniž, lǟniž]
     lǟʼnd+N+Pl+Ela: [lǟʼnist, lǟnist]
